Illinois, session 104th, SB1438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Sections 2.06, 5, 5.1, and 7 and by adding Sections 62.16a, 2.16b, and 7.11 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 10/2.06)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2212.06)8    Sec. 2.06. "Child care institution" means a child care 9facility where more than 7 children are received and 10maintained for the purpose of providing them with care or 11training or both. The term "child care institution" includes 12residential schools, primarily serving ambulatory children 13with disabilities, and those operating a full calendar year, 14but does not include:15        (a) any State-operated institution for child care 16    established by legislative action;17        (b) any juvenile detention or shelter care home 18    established and operated by any county or child protection 19    district established under the "Child Protection Act";20        (c) any institution, home, place or facility operating 21    under a license pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the 22    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 23    ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;  SB1438- 2 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1        (d) any bona fide boarding school in which children 2    are primarily taught branches of education corresponding 3    to those taught in public schools, grades one through 12, 4    or taught in public elementary schools, high schools, or 5    both elementary and high schools, and which operates on a 6    regular academic school year basis;7        (e) any facility licensed as a "group home" as defined 8    in this Act; or9        (f) any qualified residential treatment program; or 10        (g) any facility licensed as a "group home for the 11    developmentally or intellectually disabled" as defined in 12    this Act.13(Source: P.A. 103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 14    (225 ILCS 10/2.16a new)15    Sec. 2.16a. Group home for the developmentally or 16intellectually disabled. "Group home for the developmentally 17or intellectually disabled" means a child care facility that 18provides residential care to no more than 8 developmentally or 19intellectually disabled children in a single location, which 20is placed by and under the supervision of a licensed child 21welfare agency, the Department of Human Services, or a school 22district with the homes being owned, rented, staffed, 23maintained, or otherwise operated by the agency. 24    (225 ILCS 10/2.16b new)  SB1438- 3 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    Sec. 2.16b. Child who resides in a group home for the 2developmentally or intellectually disabled. "Child who resides 3in a group home for the developmentally or intellectually 4disabled" means a child up to the age of 22 who, due to a 5developmental or intellectual disability, needs special 6education and related services. 7    (225 ILCS 10/5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2215)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)9    Sec. 5. (a) In respect to child care institutions, 10maternity centers, child welfare agencies, day care centers, 11day care agencies, and group homes, and group homes for the 12developmentally or intellectually disabled, the Department, 13upon receiving application filed in proper order, shall 14examine the facilities and persons responsible for care of 15children therein.16    (b) In respect to foster family and day care homes, 17applications may be filed on behalf of such homes by a licensed 18child welfare agency, by a State agency authorized to place 19children in foster care or by out-of-State agencies approved 20by the Department to place children in this State. In respect 21to day care homes, applications may be filed on behalf of such 22homes by a licensed day care agency or licensed child welfare 23agency. In applying for license in behalf of a home in which 24children are placed by and remain under supervision of the 25applicant agency, such agency shall certify that the home and   SB1438- 4 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1persons responsible for care of unrelated children therein, or 2the home and relatives, as defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, 3responsible for the care of related children therein, were 4found to be in reasonable compliance with standards prescribed 5by the Department for the type of care indicated.6    (c) The Department shall not allow any person to examine 7facilities under a provision of this Act who has not passed an 8examination demonstrating that such person is familiar with 9this Act and with the appropriate standards and regulations of 10the Department.11    (d) With the exception of day care centers, day care 12homes, and group day care homes, licenses shall be issued in 13such form and manner as prescribed by the Department and are 14valid for 4 years from the date issued, unless revoked by the 15Department or voluntarily surrendered by the licensee. 16Licenses issued for day care centers, day care homes, and 17group day care homes shall be valid for 3 years from the date 18issued, unless revoked by the Department or voluntarily 19surrendered by the licensee. When a licensee has made timely 20and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a 21new license with reference to any activity of a continuing 22nature, the existing license shall continue in full force and 23effect for up to 30 days until the final agency decision on the 24application has been made. The Department may further extend 25the period in which such decision must be made in individual 26cases for up to 30 days, but such extensions shall be only upon   SB1438- 5 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1good cause shown.2    (e) The Department may issue one 6-month permit to a newly 3established facility for child care to allow that facility 4reasonable time to become eligible for a full license. If the 5facility for child care is a foster family home, or day care 6home the Department may issue one 2-month permit only.7    (f) The Department may issue an emergency permit to a 8child care facility taking in children as a result of the 9temporary closure for more than 2 weeks of a licensed child 10care facility due to a natural disaster. An emergency permit 11under this subsection shall be issued to a facility only if the 12persons providing child care services at the facility were 13employees of the temporarily closed day care center at the 14time it was closed. No investigation of an employee of a child 15care facility receiving an emergency permit under this 16subsection shall be required if that employee has previously 17been investigated at another child care facility. No emergency 18permit issued under this subsection shall be valid for more 19than 90 days after the date of issuance.20    (g) During the hours of operation of any licensed child 21care facility, authorized representatives of the Department 22may without notice visit the facility for the purpose of 23determining its continuing compliance with this Act or 24regulations adopted pursuant thereto.25    (h) Day care centers, day care homes, and group day care 26homes shall be monitored at least annually by a licensing   SB1438- 6 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1representative from the Department or the agency that 2recommended licensure.3(Source: P.A. 98-804, eff. 1-1-15.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)5    Sec. 5. (a) This Section does not apply to any day care 6center, day care home, or group day care home. 7    In respect to child care institutions, maternity centers, 8child welfare agencies, and group homes, and group homes for 9the developmentally or intellectually disabled, the 10Department, upon receiving application filed in proper order, 11shall examine the facilities and persons responsible for care 12of children therein.13    (b) In respect to foster family homes, applications may be 14filed on behalf of such homes by a licensed child welfare 15agency, by a State agency authorized to place children in 16foster care or by out-of-State agencies approved by the 17Department to place children in this State. In applying for 18license in behalf of a home in which children are placed by and 19remain under supervision of the applicant agency, such agency 20shall certify that the home and persons responsible for care 21of unrelated children therein, or the home and relatives, as 22defined in Section 2.17 of this Act, responsible for the care 23of related children therein, were found to be in reasonable 24compliance with standards prescribed by the Department for the 25type of care indicated.  SB1438- 7 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    (c) The Department shall not allow any person to examine 2facilities under a provision of this Act who has not passed an 3examination demonstrating that such person is familiar with 4this Act and with the appropriate standards and regulations of 5the Department.6    (d) Licenses shall be issued in such form and manner as 7prescribed by the Department and are valid for 4 years from the 8date issued, unless revoked by the Department or voluntarily 9surrendered by the licensee. When a licensee has made timely 10and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a 11new license with reference to any activity of a continuing 12nature, the existing license shall continue in full force and 13effect for up to 30 days until the final agency decision on the 14application has been made. The Department may further extend 15the period in which such decision must be made in individual 16cases for up to 30 days, but such extensions shall be only upon 17good cause shown.18    (e) The Department may issue one 6-month permit to a newly 19established facility for child care to allow that facility 20reasonable time to become eligible for a full license. If the 21facility for child care is a foster family home, the 22Department may issue one 2-month permit only.23    (f) The Department may issue an emergency permit to a 24child care facility taking in children as a result of the 25temporary closure for more than 2 weeks of a licensed child 26care facility due to a natural disaster. An emergency permit   SB1438- 8 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1under this subsection shall be issued to a facility only if the 2persons providing child care services at the facility were 3employees of the temporarily closed facility at the time it 4was closed. No investigation of an employee of a child care 5facility receiving an emergency permit under this subsection 6shall be required if that employee has previously been 7investigated at another child care facility. No emergency 8permit issued under this subsection shall be valid for more 9than 90 days after the date of issuance.10    (g) During the hours of operation of any licensed child 11care facility, authorized representatives of the Department 12may without notice visit the facility for the purpose of 13determining its continuing compliance with this Act or 14regulations adopted pursuant thereto.15    (h) (Blank).16(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 17    (225 ILCS 10/5.1)18    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)19    Sec. 5.1. (a) The Department shall ensure that no day care 20center, group home, group home for the developmentally or 21intellectually disabled, or child care institution as defined 22in this Act shall on a regular basis transport a child or 23children with any motor vehicle unless such vehicle is 24operated by a person who complies with the following 25requirements:  SB1438- 9 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1        1. is 21 years of age or older;2        2. currently holds a valid driver's license, which has 3    not been revoked or suspended for one or more traffic 4    violations during the 3 years immediately prior to the 5    date of application;6        3. demonstrates physical fitness to operate vehicles 7    by submitting the results of a medical examination 8    conducted by a licensed physician;9        4. has not been convicted of more than 2 offenses 10    against traffic regulations governing the movement of 11    vehicles within a 12-month period;12        5. has not been convicted of reckless driving or 13    driving under the influence or manslaughter or reckless 14    homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle 15    within the past 3 years;16        6. has signed and submitted a written statement 17    certifying that the person has not, through the unlawful 18    operation of a motor vehicle, caused a crash which 19    resulted in the death of any person within the 5 years 20    immediately prior to the date of application.21    However, such day care centers, group homes, group homes 22for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, and child 23care institutions may provide for transportation of a child or 24children for special outings, functions, or purposes that are 25not scheduled on a regular basis without verification that 26drivers for such purposes meet the requirements of this   SB1438- 10 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1Section.2    (a-5) As a means of ensuring compliance with the 3requirements set forth in subsection (a), the Department shall 4implement appropriate measures to verify that every individual 5who is employed at a group home, group home for the 6developmentally or intellectually disabled, or child care 7institution meets those requirements.8    For every person employed at a group home, group home for 9the developmentally or intellectually disabled, or child care 10institution who regularly transports children in the course of 11performing the person's duties, the Department must make the 12verification every 2 years. Upon the Department's request, the 13Secretary of State shall provide the Department with the 14information necessary to enable the Department to make the 15verifications required under subsection (a).16    In the case of an individual employed at a group home, 17group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 18or child care institution who becomes subject to subsection 19(a) for the first time after January 1, 2007 (the effective 20date of Public Act 94-943), the Department must make that 21verification with the Secretary of State before the individual 22operates a motor vehicle to transport a child or children 23under the circumstances described in subsection (a).24    In the case of an individual employed at a group home, 25group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 26or child care institution who is subject to subsection (a) on   SB1438- 11 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1January 1, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 94-943), the 2Department must make that verification with the Secretary of 3State within 30 days after January 1, 2007.4    If the Department discovers that an individual fails to 5meet the requirements set forth in subsection (a), the 6Department shall promptly notify the appropriate group home, 7group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 8or child care institution. 9    (b) Any individual who holds a valid Illinois school bus 10driver permit issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to the 11Illinois Vehicle Code, and who is currently employed by a 12school district or parochial school, or by a contractor with a 13school district or parochial school, to drive a school bus 14transporting children to and from school, shall be deemed in 15compliance with the requirements of subsection (a).16    (c) The Department may, pursuant to Section 8 of this Act, 17revoke the license of any day care center, group home, group 18home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, or 19child care institution that fails to meet the requirements of 20this Section.21    (d) A group home or child care institution that fails to 22meet the requirements of this Section is guilty of a petty 23offense and is subject to a fine of not more than $1,000. Each 24day that a group home, group home for the developmentally or 25intellectually disabled, or child care institution fails to 26meet the requirements of this Section is a separate offense.   SB1438- 12 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 2103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)4    Sec. 5.1. (a) The Department shall ensure that no group 5home, group home for the developmentally or intellectually 6disabled, or child care institution as defined in this Act 7shall on a regular basis transport a child or children with any 8motor vehicle unless such vehicle is operated by a person who 9complies with the following requirements:10        1. is 21 years of age or older;11        2. currently holds a valid driver's license, which has 12    not been revoked or suspended for one or more traffic 13    violations during the 3 years immediately prior to the 14    date of application;15        3. demonstrates physical fitness to operate vehicles 16    by submitting the results of a medical examination 17    conducted by a licensed physician;18        4. has not been convicted of more than 2 offenses 19    against traffic regulations governing the movement of 20    vehicles within a 12-month period;21        5. has not been convicted of reckless driving or 22    driving under the influence or manslaughter or reckless 23    homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle 24    within the past 3 years;25        6. has signed and submitted a written statement   SB1438- 13 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    certifying that the person has not, through the unlawful 2    operation of a motor vehicle, caused a crash which 3    resulted in the death of any person within the 5 years 4    immediately prior to the date of application.5    However, such group homes, group homes for the 6developmentally or intellectually disabled, and child care 7institutions may provide for transportation of a child or 8children for special outings, functions, or purposes that are 9not scheduled on a regular basis without verification that 10drivers for such purposes meet the requirements of this 11Section.12    (a-5) As a means of ensuring compliance with the 13requirements set forth in subsection (a), the Department shall 14implement appropriate measures to verify that every individual 15who is employed at a group home, group home for the 16developmentally or intellectually disabled, or child care 17institution meets those requirements.18    For every person employed at a group home, group home for 19the developmentally or intellectually disabled, or child care 20institution who regularly transports children in the course of 21performing the person's duties, the Department must make the 22verification every 2 years. Upon the Department's request, the 23Secretary of State shall provide the Department with the 24information necessary to enable the Department to make the 25verifications required under subsection (a).26    In the case of an individual employed at a group home,   SB1438- 14 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 2or child care institution who becomes subject to subsection 3(a) for the first time after January 1, 2007 (the effective 4date of Public Act 94-943), the Department must make that 5verification with the Secretary of State before the individual 6operates a motor vehicle to transport a child or children 7under the circumstances described in subsection (a).8    In the case of an individual employed at a group home, 9group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 10or child care institution who is subject to subsection (a) on 11January 1, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 94-943), the 12Department must make that verification with the Secretary of 13State within 30 days after January 1, 2007.14    If the Department discovers that an individual fails to 15meet the requirements set forth in subsection (a), the 16Department shall promptly notify the appropriate group home, 17group home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled, 18or child care institution. 19    (b) Any individual who holds a valid Illinois school bus 20driver permit issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to the 21Illinois Vehicle Code, and who is currently employed by a 22school district or parochial school, or by a contractor with a 23school district or parochial school, to drive a school bus 24transporting children to and from school, shall be deemed in 25compliance with the requirements of subsection (a).26    (c) The Department may, pursuant to Section 8 of this Act,   SB1438- 15 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1revoke the license of any group home, group home for the 2developmentally or intellectually disabled, or child care 3institution that fails to meet the requirements of this 4Section.5    (d) A group home, group home for the developmentally or 6intellectually disabled, or child care institution that fails 7to meet the requirements of this Section is guilty of a petty 8offense and is subject to a fine of not more than $1,000. Each 9day that a group home, group home for the developmentally or 10intellectually disabled, or child care institution fails to 11meet the requirements of this Section is a separate offense. 12(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 13103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-15-24.) 14    (225 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2217)15    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)16    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 17minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 18types of facilities for child care defined in this Act and that 19are equally applicable to like institutions under the control 20of the Department and to foster family homes used by and under 21the direct supervision of the Department. The Department shall 22seek the advice and assistance of persons representative of 23the various types of child care facilities in establishing 24such standards. The standards prescribed and published under 25this Act take effect as provided in the Illinois   SB1438- 16 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 2regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 3rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 4Section of this Act:5        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 6    responsibility it assumes for child care;7        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 8    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 9    the care and welfare of children served. All child day 10    care center licensees and employees who are required to 11    report child abuse or neglect under the Abused and 12    Neglected Child Reporting Act shall be required to attend 13    training on recognizing child abuse and neglect, as 14    prescribed by Department rules;15        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 16    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 17    to maintain prescribed standards;18        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 19    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 20    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 21    institution, maternity center, day care center, group 22    home, group home for the developmentally or intellectually 23    disabled, day care home, and group day care home shall 24    have on its premises during its hours of operation at 25    least one staff member certified in first aid, in the 26    Heimlich maneuver and in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by   SB1438- 17 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    the American Red Cross or other organization approved by 2    rule of the Department. Child welfare agencies shall not 3    be subject to such a staffing requirement. The Department 4    may offer, or arrange for the offering, on a periodic 5    basis in each community in this State in cooperation with 6    the American Red Cross, the American Heart Association or 7    other appropriate organization, voluntary programs to 8    train operators of foster family homes and day care homes 9    in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;10        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 11    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 12    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 13    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 14    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 15    received;16        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 17    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 18    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 19    development of children served;20        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 21    children served;22        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 23    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children, 24    including, for day care centers and day care homes, 25    records indicating each child has been immunized as 26    required by State regulations. The Department shall   SB1438- 18 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    require proof that children enrolled in a facility have 2    been immunized against Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);3        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;4        (10) Discipline of children;5        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular 6    religious faith of the children served;7        (12) Provisions prohibiting firearms on day care 8    center premises except in the possession of peace 9    officers;10        (13) Provisions prohibiting handguns on day care home 11    premises except in the possession of peace officers or 12    other adults who must possess a handgun as a condition of 13    employment and who reside on the premises of a day care 14    home;15        (14) Provisions requiring that any firearm permitted 16    on day care home premises, except handguns in the 17    possession of peace officers, shall be kept in a 18    disassembled state, without ammunition, in locked storage, 19    inaccessible to children and that ammunition permitted on 20    day care home premises shall be kept in locked storage 21    separate from that of disassembled firearms, inaccessible 22    to children;23        (15) Provisions requiring notification of parents or 24    guardians enrolling children at a day care home of the 25    presence in the day care home of any firearms and 26    ammunition and of the arrangements for the separate,   SB1438- 19 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    locked storage of such firearms and ammunition;2        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 3    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 4    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 5    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 6    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 7    American Academy of Pediatrics; and 8        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions 9    requiring the Department to review quality of care 10    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 11    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 12    children. 13    By July 1, 2022, all licensed day care home providers, 14licensed group day care home providers, and licensed day care 15center directors and classroom staff shall participate in at 16least one training that includes the topics of early childhood 17social emotional learning, infant and early childhood mental 18health, early childhood trauma, or adverse childhood 19experiences. Current licensed providers, directors, and 20classroom staff shall complete training by July 1, 2022 and 21shall participate in training that includes the above topics 22at least once every 3 years. 23    (b) If, in a facility for general child care, there are 24children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed as 25having an intellectual or physical disability, who are 26determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of   SB1438- 20 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 2Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 3Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, 4or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 5nursing care provided by the institution.6    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 7to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is 8any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 9prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 10person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 11identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 12of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 13foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 14alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 15participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 16self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 17Department determines that the foster family home can provide 18a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 19emotional needs of children.20    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 21published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 22through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 23applicants and licensees in meeting and maintaining minimum 24requirements for a license and to help them otherwise to 25achieve programs of excellence related to the care of children 26served. Such consultation shall include providing information   SB1438- 21 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1concerning education and training in early childhood 2development to providers of day care home services. The 3Department may provide or arrange for such education and 4training for those providers who request such assistance.5    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing 6standards to all licensees and applicants for a license. Each 7licensee or holder of a permit shall distribute copies of the 8appropriate licensing standards and any other information 9required by the Department to child care facilities under its 10supervision. Each licensee or holder of a permit shall 11maintain appropriate documentation of the distribution of the 12standards. Such documentation shall be part of the records of 13the facility and subject to inspection by authorized 14representatives of the Department.15    (f) The Department shall prepare summaries of day care 16licensing standards. Each licensee or holder of a permit for a 17day care facility shall distribute a copy of the appropriate 18summary and any other information required by the Department, 19to the legal guardian of each child cared for in that facility 20at the time when the child is enrolled or initially placed in 21the facility. The licensee or holder of a permit for a day care 22facility shall secure appropriate documentation of the 23distribution of the summary and brochure. Such documentation 24shall be a part of the records of the facility and subject to 25inspection by an authorized representative of the Department.26    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and   SB1438- 22 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 2applicable to such person's facility. Each licensee or holder 3of a permit shall make available by posting at all times in a 4common or otherwise accessible area a complete and current set 5of licensing standards in order that all employees of the 6facility may have unrestricted access to such standards. All 7employees of the facility shall have reviewed the standards 8and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or holder of a 9permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of the current 10review of licensing standards by all employees. Such records 11shall be part of the records of the facility and subject to 12inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.13    (h) Any standards involving physical examinations, 14immunization, or medical treatment shall include appropriate 15exemptions for children whose parents object thereto on the 16grounds that they conflict with the tenets and practices of a 17recognized church or religious organization, of which the 18parent is an adherent or member, and for children who should 19not be subjected to immunization for clinical reasons.20    (i) The Department, in cooperation with the Department of 21Public Health, shall work to increase immunization awareness 22and participation among parents of children enrolled in day 23care centers and day care homes by publishing on the 24Department's website information about the benefits of 25immunization against vaccine preventable diseases, including 26influenza and pertussis. The information for vaccine   SB1438- 23 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1preventable diseases shall include the incidence and severity 2of the diseases, the availability of vaccines, and the 3importance of immunizing children and persons who frequently 4have close contact with children. The website content shall be 5reviewed annually in collaboration with the Department of 6Public Health to reflect the most current recommendations of 7the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). The 8Department shall work with day care centers and day care homes 9licensed under this Act to ensure that the information is 10annually distributed to parents in August or September.11    (j) Any standard adopted by the Department that requires 12an applicant for a license to operate a day care home to 13include a copy of a high school diploma or equivalent 14certificate with the person's application shall be deemed to 15be satisfied if the applicant includes a copy of a high school 16diploma or equivalent certificate or a copy of a degree from an 17accredited institution of higher education or vocational 18institution or equivalent certificate.19(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 20    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)21    Sec. 7. (a) The Department must prescribe and publish 22minimum standards for licensing that apply to the various 23types of facilities for child care defined in this Act (other 24than a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) 25and that are equally applicable to like institutions under the   SB1438- 24 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1control of the Department and to foster family homes used by 2and under the direct supervision of the Department. The 3Department shall seek the advice and assistance of persons 4representative of the various types of child care facilities 5in establishing such standards. The standards prescribed and 6published under this Act take effect as provided in the 7Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, and are restricted to 8regulations pertaining to the following matters and to any 9rules and regulations required or permitted by any other 10Section of this Act:11        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 12    responsibility it assumes for child care;13        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 14    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 15    the care and welfare of children served.;16        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 17    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 18    to maintain prescribed standards;19        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 20    insure adequate supervision and care of the children 21    received. The standards shall provide that each child care 22    institution, maternity center, and group home, and group 23    home for the developmentally or intellectually disabled 24    shall have on its premises during its hours of operation 25    at least one staff member certified in first aid, in the 26    Heimlich maneuver and in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by   SB1438- 25 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    the American Red Cross or other organization approved by 2    rule of the Department. Child welfare agencies shall not 3    be subject to such a staffing requirement. The Department 4    may offer, or arrange for the offering, on a periodic 5    basis in each community in this State in cooperation with 6    the American Red Cross, the American Heart Association or 7    other appropriate organization, voluntary programs to 8    train operators of foster family homes and day care homes 9    in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;10        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 11    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 12    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 13    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 14    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 15    received;16        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 17    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 18    to assure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 19    development of children served;20        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 21    children served;22        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 23    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children. 24    The Department shall require proof that children enrolled 25    in a facility (other than a day care center, day care home, 26    or group day care home) have been immunized against   SB1438- 26 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1    Haemophilus Influenzae B (HIB);2        (9) Filing of reports with the Department;3        (10) Discipline of children;4        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular 5    religious faith of the children served;6        (12) (Blank);7        (13) (Blank);8        (14) (Blank);9        (15) (Blank);10        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 11    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 12    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 13    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 14    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 15    American Academy of Pediatrics (other than employees of a 16    day care center, day care home, or group day care home); 17    and 18        (17) With respect to foster family homes, provisions 19    requiring the Department to review quality of care 20    concerns and to consider those concerns in determining 21    whether a foster family home is qualified to care for 22    children. 23    (b) If, in a facility for general child care (other than a 24day care center, day care home, or group day care home), there 25are children diagnosed as mentally ill or children diagnosed 26as having an intellectual or physical disability, who are   SB1438- 27 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1determined to be in need of special mental treatment or of 2nursing care, or both mental treatment and nursing care, the 3Department shall seek the advice and recommendation of the 4Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, 5or both Departments regarding the residential treatment and 6nursing care provided by the institution.7    (c) The Department shall investigate any person applying 8to be licensed as a foster parent to determine whether there is 9any evidence of current drug or alcohol abuse in the 10prospective foster family. The Department shall not license a 11person as a foster parent if drug or alcohol abuse has been 12identified in the foster family or if a reasonable suspicion 13of such abuse exists, except that the Department may grant a 14foster parent license to an applicant identified with an 15alcohol or drug problem if the applicant has successfully 16participated in an alcohol or drug treatment program, 17self-help group, or other suitable activities and if the 18Department determines that the foster family home can provide 19a safe, appropriate environment and meet the physical and 20emotional needs of children.21    (d) The Department, in applying standards prescribed and 22published, as herein provided, shall offer consultation 23through employed staff or other qualified persons to assist 24applicants and licensees (other than applicants and licensees 25of a day care center, day care home, or group day care home) in 26meeting and maintaining minimum requirements for a license and   SB1438- 28 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1to help them otherwise to achieve programs of excellence 2related to the care of children served. Such consultation 3shall include providing information concerning education and 4training in early childhood development to providers of day 5care home services. The Department may provide or arrange for 6such education and training for those providers who request 7such assistance (other than providers at a day care center, 8day care home, or group day care home).9    (e) The Department shall distribute copies of licensing 10standards to all licensees and applicants for a license (other 11than licensees and applicants of a day care center, day care 12home, or group day care home). Each licensee or holder of a 13permit shall distribute copies of the appropriate licensing 14standards and any other information required by the Department 15to child care facilities under its supervision. Each licensee 16or holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation 17of the distribution of the standards. Such documentation shall 18be part of the records of the facility and subject to 19inspection by authorized representatives of the Department.20    (f) (Blank).21    (g) The Department shall distribute to each licensee and 22holder of a permit copies of the licensing or permit standards 23applicable to such person's facility (other than a day care 24center, day care home, or group day care home). Each licensee 25or holder of a permit shall make available by posting at all 26times in a common or otherwise accessible area a complete and   SB1438- 29 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1current set of licensing standards in order that all employees 2of the facility may have unrestricted access to such 3standards. All employees of the facility shall have reviewed 4the standards and any subsequent changes. Each licensee or 5holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate documentation of 6the current review of licensing standards by all employees. 7Such records shall be part of the records of the facility and 8subject to inspection by authorized representatives of the 9Department.10    (h) Any standards (other than standards of a day care 11center, day care home, or group day care home) involving 12physical examinations, immunization, or medical treatment 13shall include appropriate exemptions for children whose 14parents object thereto on the grounds that they conflict with 15the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious 16organization, of which the parent is an adherent or member, 17and for children who should not be subjected to immunization 18for clinical reasons.19    (i) (Blank).20    (j) (Blank).21(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 22103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 23    (225 ILCS 10/7.11 new)24    Sec. 7.11. Staff age requirement at a group home for the 25developmentally or intellectually disabled. No group home for   SB1438- 30 -LRB104 06258 AAS 16293 b1the developmentally or intellectually disabled shall hire a 2staff member who is under 19 years of age. 3    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 4changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 5that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 6represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 7not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 8made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 9Public Act. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.